Ohio, session 136, HB826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2921.311 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2921.311. (A) No public official shall purposely prevent, obstruct, or delay federal immigration enforcement. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of obstructing federal immigration enforcement, a felony of the fifth degree.